dev/shupashkar/apertium-tt-ru.ru.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%<n%>   ! Имя существительное · Noun
%<adj%> ! Имя прилагательное 
%<prep%> ! Предлог
%<conjoo%> ! Союз
%<adv%> ! Наречие
%<sg%> ! Единственное число
%<pl%> ! Множественное число
%<sclon1%> ! Склонение 1
%<sclon2%> ! Склонение 2
%<sclon3%> ! Склонение 3
%{Ы%} ! 'а' в 'ы' или 'и' 
%{Е%} ! 'о' в 'е'
%{ЕЕ%} ! 'а' в 'е'
%{У%} ! 'о' в 'у' или 'ю'
%{УУ%} ! 'а' в 'у' или 'ю'
%{О%} ! 'а' в 'о' или 'е'
%{А%} ! 'о' в 'а'
%<gend%> ! Род
%<acc%> ! Винительный падеж
%<nom%> ! Именительный падеж
%<gen%> ! Родительный падеж
%<dat%> ! Дательный падеж
%<ins%> ! Творительный падеж
%<prp%> ! Предложный падеж
%{И%} ! 'а' в 'и'
%{К%} ! 'а' в 0
%<v%> ! Глагол
%<prn_pers%> ! Личные местоимения
%<prn_ques%> ! Вопросительные местоимения
%<vvod%> ! Вводные слова
%<comma%> ! Запятая
%<prep%> ! Предлоги
%<chisl%> ! Имя числительное
%<prn_dir%> ! Указательные местоимения

%<f%> ! Женский род
%<m%> ! Мужской род
%<n%> ! Средний род
%<mfn%> ! Все
%<pres%>
%<past%>
%<imp%>
%<ant%>
%<np%>


LEXICON Root

Nouns ; 
Adjectives ;
Prepositions ;
Conjunctions ;
Adverbs ;
Verbs ;
Pronouns_Pers ;
Pronouns_Quest ;
VvodnoeSlovo
Punct ;
Prepositions ;
Numbers ;
Pronouns_Dir ;


LEXICON Numbers

шесть%<chisl%>%<nom%>:шесть # ;
шесть%<chisl%>%<gen%>:шести # ;
шесть%<chisl%>%<dat%>:шести # ;
шесть%<chisl%>%<acc%>:шесть # ;
шесть%<chisl%>%<ins%>:шестью # ;
шесть%<chisl%>%<prp%>:шести # ;

один%<chisl%>%<nom%>:один # ;
один%<chisl%>%<gen%>:одного # ;
один%<chisl%>%<dat%>:одному # ;
один%<chisl%>%<acc%>:одного # ;
один%<chisl%>%<ins%>:одним # ;
один%<chisl%>%<prp%>:одном # ;

два%<chisl%>%<nom%>:два # ;
два%<chisl%>%<gen%>:двух # ;
два%<chisl%>%<dat%>:двум # ;
два%<chisl%>%<acc%>:двоих # ;
два%<chisl%>%<ins%>:двумя # ;
два%<chisl%>%<prp%>:двух # ;




LEXICON PREP
%<prep%>: # ;

LEXICON VV
# ;
!%<vvod%>:%>%<comma%> # ;

LEXICON Punct
,%<comma%>:, # ;

LEXICON PRON_Q
%<prn_ques%>: # ;

LEXICON Pronouns_Quest
где PRON_Q ;
почему PRON_Q ;
что PRON_Q ;
куда PRON_Q ;

LEXICON Pronouns_Dir
это%<prn_dir%>%<nom%>:это # ;
это%<prn_dir%>%<gen%>:этого # ;
это%<prn_dir%>%<dat%>:этому # ;
это%<prn_dir%>%<acc%>:это # ;
это%<prn_dir%>%<ins%>:этим # ;
это%<prn_dir%>%<prp%>:этом # ;

LEXICON Pronouns_Pers

я%<prn_pers%>%<nom%>:я # ;
я%<prn_pers%>%<gen%>:меня # ;
я%<prn_pers%>%<dat%>:мне # ;
я%<prn_pers%>%<acc%>:меня # ;
я%<prn_pers%>%<ins%>:мной # ;
я%<prn_pers%>%<prp%>:мне # ;

он%<prn_pers%>%<nom%>:он # ;
он%<prn_pers%>%<gen%>:его # ;
он%<prn_pers%>%<dat%>:ему # ;
он%<prn_pers%>%<acc%>:его # ;
он%<prn_pers%>%<ins%>:им # ;
он%<prn_pers%>%<prp%>:нем # ;

она%<prn_pers%>%<nom%>:она # ;
она%<prn_pers%>%<gen%>:ее # ;
она%<prn_pers%>%<dat%>:ей # ;
она%<prn_pers%>%<acc%>:ее # ;
она%<prn_pers%>%<ins%>:ей # ;
она%<prn_pers%>%<prp%>:ней # ;

они%<prn_pers%>%<nom%>:они # ;
они%<prn_pers%>%<gen%>:их # ;
они%<prn_pers%>%<dat%>:им # ;
они%<prn_pers%>%<acc%>:их # ;
они%<prn_pers%>%<ins%>:ими # ;
они%<prn_pers%>%<prp%>:них # ;

ты%<prn_pers%>%<nom%>:ты # ;
ты%<prn_pers%>%<gen%>:тебя # ;
ты%<prn_pers%>%<dat%>:тебе # ;
ты%<prn_pers%>%<acc%>:тебя # ;
ты%<prn_pers%>%<ins%>:тобой # ;
ты%<prn_pers%>%<prp%>:тебе # ;

что%<prn_pers%>%<nom%>:что # ;
что%<prn_pers%>%<gen%>:чего # ;

какой-нибудь%<prn_pers%>%<nom%>:какой-нибудь # ;
какой-нибудь%<prn_pers%>%<gen%>:какого-нибудь # ;
какой-нибудь%<prn_pers%>%<dat%>:какому-нибудь # ;
какой-нибудь%<prn_pers%>%<acc%>:какой-нибудь # ;
какой-нибудь%<prn_pers%>%<ins%>:каким-нибудь # ;
какой-нибудь%<prn_pers%>%<prp%>:каком-нибудь # ;


LEXICON CASE
!%<n%>%<nom%>%<sg%>%<sclon2%>%<m%>: # ;
!%<n%>%<gen%>%<sg%>%<sclon2%>%<m%>:%>a # ;
!%<n%>%<dat%>%<sg%>%<sclon2%>%<m%>:%>у # ;
!%<n%>%<acc%>%<sg%>%<sclon2%>%<m%>: # ;
!%<n%>%<ins%>%<sg%>%<sclon2%>%<m%>:%>ом # ;
!%<n%>%<prp%>%<sg%>%<sclon2%>%<m%>:%>у # ;

!%<n%>%<nom%>%<pl%>%<sclon2%>%<m%>:%>a ;
!%<n%>%<gen%>%<pl%>%<sclon2%>%<m%>: # ;
!%<n%>%<dat%>%<pl%>%<sclon2%>%<m%>:%>ам # ;
!%<n%>%<acc%>%<pl%>%<sclon2%>%<m%>:%>а ;
!%<n%>%<ins%>%<pl%>%<sclon2%>%<m%>:%>ами # ;
!%<n%>%<prp%>%<pl%>%<sclon2%>%<m%>:%>ах # ;

!%<n%>%<nom%>%<sg%>%<sclon2%>%<n%>:%>о # ;
!%<n%>%<gen%>%<sg%>%<sclon2%>%<n%>:%>а # ;
!%<n%>%<dat%>%<sg%>%<sclon2%>%<n%>:%>у # ;
!%<n%>%<acc%>%<sg%>%<sclon2%>%<n%>:%>о # ;
!%<n%>%<ins%>%<sg%>%<sclon2%>%<n%>:%>ом # ;
!%<n%>%<prp%>%<sg%>%<sclon2%>%<n%>:%>е # ;

!%<n%>%<nom%>%<sg%>%<sclon1%>:%>%{Я%} # ;
!%<n%>%<gen%>%<sg%>%<sclon1%>:%>%{Ы%} # ;
!%<n%>%<dat%>%<sg%>%<sclon1%>:%>е # ;
!%<n%>%<acc%>%<sg%>%<sclon1%>:%>%{У%} # ;
!%<n%>%<ins%>%<sg%>%<sclon1%>:%>%{О%}й # ;
!%<n%>%<prp%>%<sg%>%<sclon1%>:%>е # ;

!%<n%>%<nom%>%<pl%>%<sclon1%>:%>%{И%} # ;
!%<n%>%<gen%>%<pl%>%<sclon1%>: # ;
!%<n%>%<dat%>%<pl%>%<sclon1%>:%>%{Я%}м # ;
!%<n%>%<acc%>%<pl%>%<sclon1%>: # ;
!%<n%>%<ins%>%<pl%>%<sclon1%>:%>%{Я%}ми # ;
!%<n%>%<prp%>%<pl%>%<sclon1%>:%>%{Я%}х # ;

LEXICON PRN_D

%<prn_d%>: # ;

LEXICON CHISL

%<chisl%>: # ;

LEXICON GEND

%<f%>: # ;
%<m%>: # ;
%<n%>: # ;

LEXICON NUM

%<sg%>: #;
%<pl%>: # ;

LEXICON ADV 
%<adv%>: # ;

LEXICON CONJOO
%<conjoo%>: # ;
 
LEXICON PREP

%<prep%>: # ;

LEXICON COMMON-Muzh-kak-Zhen-Mjak

%<n%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:я # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:ю # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:и # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:ей # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:е # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<prp%>:е # ;
%<n%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:и # ;
%<n%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:ь # ;
%<n%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:ь # ;
%<n%>%<pl%>%<ins%>:ями # ;
%<n%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:ям # ;
%<n%>%<pl%>%<prp%>:ях # ;

LEXICON N1-Muzh-kak-Zhen-Mjak

%<n%>%<sg%>%<nom%> COMMON-Muzh-kak-Zhen-Mjak ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<acc%> COMMON-Muzh-kak-Zhen-Mjak ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<gen%> COMMON-Muzh-kak-Zhen-Mjak ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<ins%> COMMON-Muzh-kak-Zhen-Mjak ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<dat%> COMMON-Muzh-kak-Zhen-Mjak ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<prp%> COMMON-Muzh-kak-Zhen-Mjak ;
%<n%>%<pl%>%<nom%> COMMON-Muzh-kak-Zhen-Mjak ;
%<n%>%<pl%>%<acc%> COMMON-Muzh-kak-Zhen-Mjak ;
%<n%>%<pl%>%<gen%> COMMON-Muzh-kak-Zhen-Mjak ;
%<n%>%<pl%>%<ins%> COMMON-Muzh-kak-Zhen-Mjak ;
%<n%>%<pl%>%<dat%> COMMON-Muzh-kak-Zhen-Mjak ;
%<n%>%<pl%>%<prp%> COMMON-Muzh-kak-Zhen-Mjak ;

LEXICON NP-Ant-M-Muzh-kak-Zhen-Mjak

%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>: COMMON-Muzh-kak-Zhen-Mjak ;

LEXICON NP-Ant-F

%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>: CASE ;

LEXICON N1

%<n%>: CASE ;

LEXICON A1

%<adj%>: CASE ;

LEXICON PRN_PERS

%<prn_pers%>: # ;

LEXICON V

%<v%>: # ;

LEXICON V-A

%<v%>%<inf%>:ть # ;
%<v%>%<pres%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:ю # ;
%<v%>%<pres%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:ешь # ;
%<v%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:ет # ;
%<v%>%<pres%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:ем # ;
%<v%>%<pres%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:ете # ;
%<v%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:ют # ;
%<v%>%<past%>: V-Past-Forms ;
%<v%>%<imp%>:й # ;

LEXICON V-Past-Forms

%<m%>%<sg%>:л # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>:ло # ;
%<f%>%<sg%>:ла # ;
%<mfn%>%<pl%>:ли # ;

LEXICON Nouns

собака N1 ; ! ""
погода N1 ; ! ""
сад:сад N1 ; ! ""
мальчик:мальчик N1 ; ! ""
Маша:Маш NP-Ant-F ; ! ""
Ваня:Ван NP-Ant-M-Muzh-kak-Zhen-Mjak ; ! ""
мама N1 ; ! ""
сестра N1 ; ! ""
ребенок N1 ; ! ""
дом N1 ; ! ""
кошка N1 ; ! ""
окно N1 ; ! ""
дерево N1 ; ! ""
глаз N1 ; ! ""
рука N1 ; ! ""
игра N1 ; ! ""
ответ N1 ; ! ""
вопрос N1 ; ! ""
человек N1 ; ! ""
стол N1 ; ! ""
стул N1 ; ! ""
звук N1 ; ! ""
птица N1 ; ! ""
животное N1 ; ! ""
голова N1 ; ! ""
вода N1 ; ! ""
девочка N1 ; ! ""
улица N1 ; ! ""
внимание N1 ; ! ""
возраст N1 ; ! ""
причина N1 ; ! ""
пора N1 ; ! ""

кошка%<sg%>%<nom%>:кошка # ;
кошка%<sg%>%<gen%>:кошки # ;
кошка%<sg%>%<dat%>:кошке # ;
кошка%<sg%>%<acc%>:кошку # ;
кошка%<sg%>%<ins%>:кошкой # ;
кошка%<sg%>%<prp%>:кошке # ;



LEXICON Adjectives

хороший A1 ;
маленький A1 ;
счастливый A1 ;
большой A1 ;
старый A1 ;
маленький A1 ;

LEXICON Prepositions

в PREP ;

LEXICON Conjunctions

и CONJOO ;
но только CONJOO ;
но CONJOO ;
однако CONJOO ;
и CONJOO ;

LEXICON Adverbs
вчера ADV ;
очень ADV ;
холодно ADV ;
сегодня ADV ;
довольно ADV ;
тепло ADV ;
всегда ADV ;
вместе ADV ;
затем ADV ;
хорошо ADV ;
ближе ADV ;
везде ADV ;
там ADV ;
пока что ADV ;
смотря ADV ;
быстро ADV ;
потом ADV ;
снова ADV ;
сейчас ADV ;

LEXICON Verbs
быть V ;
играть:игра V-A ;

LEXICON VvodnoeSlovo
нет VV ; ! ""
конечно VV ; ! ""
говорит VV ; ! ""

LEXICON Prepositions
напротив PREP ;
из-за PREP ;
под PREP ;
